Washington statutes.
RCW 4.56.050

Effect of judgment against executor or administrator.

When a setoff shall be established in an action brought by executors or administrators, and a balance found due to the defendant, the judgment rendered thereon against the plaintiff shall have the same effect as if the action had been originally commenced by the defendant.

[Code 1881 s 500; 1877 p 107 s 504; RRS s 269.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 54(b).